 "He added, 'There are mice that are currently being treated for diabetes that are four months old.'"
 Dr. Ehud Ur, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and president of the Canadian Diabetes Association's Clinical Science Division, warned that the study is still in its early stages.
 Like other experts, he is skeptical about the treatment of diabetes, and these results do not apply to patients with type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Swedish Academy Nobel Prize literature committee secretary Sara Danius told Swedish Radio's radio program that the committee had publicly announced that it had given up trying to contact Bob Dylan to deliver the news of the 2016 Nobel Prize in Literature to him.
 "Danius said, "We're not doing anything right now. I called his closest collaborator and sent him an email, and he was very kind and wrote back. For now, that's enough."
 Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff said he started the company when he couldn't hear his shop's doorbell from his garage.
 He said he created a Wi-Fi doorbell.
 Siminoff said in 2013 that sales increased after the Shark Tank episode in which the show's cast members rejected the startup's funding request.
 In late 2017, Siminovski appeared on the shopping television channel QVC.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with competitor ADT.
 One experimental vaccine appears to reduce the death rate from Ebola, but no drug has yet been clearly proven to treat existing infections.
 The antibody cocktail ZMapp initially showed promise in the field, but formal studies have shown it to be less effective at preventing death than expected.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp served as a control, meaning scientists used it as a baseline and compared the other three treatments to it.
 The U.S. Gymnastics Federation supports the U.S. Olympic Committee's letter and recognizes the absolute need for Olympic officials to help former athletes have a safe environment.
 We agree with the USOC that meaningful change within the organization is better than withdrawal, and that we can achieve better outcomes for athletes, teams, and the sport.
 The U.S. gymnastics team supports an independent investigation into how the facts that Larry Nassar's victims have bravely spoken about were not known for so long and how to make sure that this never happens again.
 The U.S. gymnastics team and the USOC have the same goal: to make the sport of gymnastics, and sports in general, as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a positive and encouraging environment.
 Throughout the 1960s, Breszinski served as a counselor to Kennedy and then worked in the Lyndon Johnson administration.
 He advised Carter on foreign policy during the 1976 campaign, and from 1977 to 1981, he served as National Security Advisor to President Ronald Reagan.
 As NSA, he advised President Carter on diplomatic handling of world issues such as Camp David Accords, the normalization of U.S.-China relations in the late 1970s, the Iran hostage crisis that followed the Iranian Revolution of 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, was nominated for all the major awards.
 Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone were both nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 Other categories include Best Picture, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Costume Design, Best Film Editing, Best Original Score, Best Production Design, Best Sound Editing, Best Sound Mixing, and Best Original Screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, "Dreams of Toys" and "City of Stars," were nominated for Best Original Song. The Lion King studio received 26 nominations, more than any other studio.
 Donald Trump, the US president, announced in a statement released by his spokesman late on Sunday that the US military would withdraw from Syria.
 The announcement came after Trump spoke by phone with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdogan.
 Turkey also said it would protect captured ISIS fighters that European countries refuse to repatriate to their home countries.
 This not only confirms the widely held theory that some dinosaurs had feathers, but also provides details that are usually lacking in fossils, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists have revealed that the top of the feather was purple and the bottom was white or yellow.
 Such discoveries also provide insight into the evolution of feathers in birds.
 Dinosaur feathers lacked the well-developed vane, but had other distinctive features such as barbs and small barbules, and researchers have speculated that these other features later evolved into vanes.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that they were not used for flight, but for thermoregulation or display. Researchers examined a sample from the tail of a young dinosaur and found that the feathers were not juvenile, but adult feathers.
 This is the tail of a young dinosaur, but the sample shows that the feathers are not juvenile, but adult, the researchers say.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded in a police station in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and injuring more than 20 other people.
 The governor said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police said they are holding the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant (ISIL) militant group responsible for the attack.
 They discovered that the sun works on the same principle as the other stars, by emitting light and rotating.
 The combination of luminosity and rotation determines the stellar Rossby number, which is related to the plasma flow.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is in terms of magnetic reversals.
 During the trip, Iwaski encountered several difficulties.
 He was robbed by pirates, attacked by mad dogs in Tibet, almost married in Nepal, and arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard works on both the 2.4GHz and 5.0GHz frequencies.
 If the base station has a dual radio, this will allow 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g to be backward compatible.
 802.11n theoretically has a bandwidth of up to 600 Mbit/s, which is considerably faster than the previous standard.
 Duval, a married man with two adult children, did not make a deep impression on Miller.
 When asked for his opinion, Miller said, "During the hearing, the microphone was talking a lot... I was not listening because I was preparing."
 "By 2020, we will endeavor to reduce CO2 emissions per unit of GDP by a significant margin from the 2005 level," he said.
 He said the scale of the cut would be based on China's economic output, but did not give a figure.
 "Hu urged developing countries to ""break the old habit of first polluting and then cleaning up.""
 "But that does not mean we should ask them to go beyond their stage of development and their capacity to assume obligations that go beyond their responsibility," he added.
 The Iraqi study group released its report at 12 GMT (Greenwich Mean Time) today.
 At this point, there is no guarantee that Iraq's actions will prevent sectarian warfare, an increase in violence, or chaos.
 The report begins with a plea for open debate and consensus-building on U.S. policy in the Middle East.
 The report is highly critical of almost every aspect of the administration's current Iraq policy and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 First, one of the 78 recommendations is to develop a new diplomatic strategy by the end of the year to secure the borders and re-establish diplomatic relations with neighboring countries in preparation for hostile intervention in Iraq.
 Current senator and wife of Argentina's president, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy for the presidency yesterday in La Plata, 50 km from Buenos Aires.
 In 2005, Kirchner announced her intention to run for president at the same venue, the Argentine Theatre, where she had begun her senatorial campaign as a member of the Buenos Aires delegation.
 After Hurricane Katrina, spending on relief and reconstruction was dubbed the "Bush's New Orleans Deal" by those who took a conservative view of the national budget.
 Liberal criticism of the reconstruction effort focused on what insiders in Washington called the "reconstruction contracting" scandal.
 More than 4 million people came to Rome for the funeral.
 The crowd was so large that most of them could not get into the funeral procession in St. Peter's Square.
 Several large television screens were set up in various parts of Rome so that people could watch the funeral.
 In many Italian cities and in other cities around the world, especially in Poland, similar screens have been set up so that many people can see them.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policy of focusing resources on easy cases, such as stolen vehicles, in order to artificially inflate the agency's success rate.
 Congress allocated funding for the program in the 2005 budget, and the FBI was mandated to have at least 10 agents dedicated to the adult pornography sector.
 Robin Uthappa scored the most runs in an inning, with 70 runs in 41 balls, including 4 sixes and 2 fours.
 Middle order batsmen Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid were in fine form and put on a 100-run partnership.
 However, after losing the wicket, India lost seven wickets to end the innings and scored only 36 runs.
 President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16 to begin a week-long tour of Asia.
 He was greeted by Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister Wong Kan Seng and discussed trade and terrorism issues with Singapore's Prime Minister Lee Hsien Loong.
 Bush, after a week of defeats in the midterm elections, announced a trade expansion policy in Asia.
 Prime Minister Stephen Harper agreed Tuesday to send all cabinet ministers a copy of the government's "air pollution act" to review before the second reading of the bill.
 "Layton, in a meeting with the prime minister, asked for the Conservative Party's environment bill to be "re-written from scratch" and called for changes to the Conservative Party's environment bill."
 When the federal government intervened to take over funding for Mushi-Mushi Hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, state governments and some federal MPs accused the move of being a ploy to win votes in the November federal election.
 However, John Howard said the move was to prevent the Tasmanian government from downgrading hospital facilities, and he added an extra $45 million.
 Recent reports have indicated that the tsunami was recorded at sea level, and that it actually struck near the islands of Palau and Niue.
 There were no major damage or injuries reported in Tonga, but the country's power supply was temporarily cut off, and the Tongan authorities were not able to receive the tsunami warning from the PTWC.
 Fourteen Hawaii schools on or near the coast were closed Wednesday despite the fact that the alert was lifted.
 President George W. Bush welcomed the announcement.
 "Bush spokesman Gordon Johndro said of the North's pledge, "It's a major step toward denuclearizing the Korean peninsula."
 The 10th hurricane of the Atlantic hurricane season, Tropical Storm Jerry, was formed in the Atlantic today.
 According to the National Hurricane Center (NHC), Tropical Storm Jerry is no longer a threat.
 The U.S. Army Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain per hour could overwhelm the levee.
 The Ninth Ward, which was inundated by floodwaters up to 20 feet high during Hurricane Katrina, is now being flooded by nearby levees.
 Water flows over the 100-foot-wide dam.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his displeasure with the deletion in a phone call with Wikinews last month.
 "He lied to us from the beginning, first saying it was all because of legal reasons, then pretending to listen to us until the very end."
 Recent community backlash has led to an effort to create a policy draft for the sexual content on sites that host millions of open licensed media.
 Although mostly theoretical, the program is designed to simulate observations of the Draco Galaxy.
 The effect the team was looking for could have been caused by the gravitational tug of dark matter between galaxies and the dark matter in the intergalactic medium.
 Just as the Moon exerts a gravitational pull on Earth, causing tides, the Milky Way exerts a gravitational pull on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 Scientists concluded that dark matter affects other dark matter in the same way as ordinary matter.
 According to this theory, most of the dark matter around galaxies is located in a halo around the galaxy, consisting of a large number of small particles.
 TV reports show white smoke coming from the factory.
 Local authorities have warned residents near the plant to stay indoors and not to drink tap water.
 According to Japanese government agencies involved in nuclear issues, radioactive cesium and iodine were detected at the plant.
 Authorities believe this indicates that a container holding the uranium fuel at the site has ruptured and is leaking.
 Dr. Tony Moll discovered XDR-TB in the South African region of KwaZulu-Natal.
 He said in an interview that the new variant is "very high mortality, very difficult to deal with, and scary."
 Dr. Moll thought some patients may have been infected in the hospital, and at least two of them were healthy hospital workers.
 In one year, one infected person can infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 However, the proportion of total TB patients with XDR-TB is not very high. At a given moment, there are 330,000 TB patients in South Africa, and about 6,000 of them have XDR-TB.
 Weighing more than 1,000 pounds and traveling at about 17,500 miles per hour, the two satellites collided at an altitude of 491 miles above the Earth.
 Scientists say the explosion was huge.
 They are still studying the size of the impact and what effects it will have on the Earth.
 The U.S. Defense Department's Strategic Command is tracking the debris.
 The results of the analysis will be published on an open website.
 The mother of a doctor who worked at a Pittsburgh children's hospital was found dead in the doctor's car trunk Wednesday, and authorities in Ohio said they will charge the doctor with aggravated murder.
 Dr. Malar A. Balasubramaniyan, 29, was found lying on the ground next to a road in Blue Ash, Ohio, a suburb of Cincinnati, wearing only a T-shirt and underwear and under the influence of drugs.
 She pointed to her black Oldsmobile Intri-G, which was 150 feet away.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Saroja Balasubramanian, covered in blood-soaked blankets.
 Police said the body had been there for a day or so.
 The first case of the season was reported in late July.
 The disease is carried by pigs, then by mosquitoes to humans.
 The outbreak has prompted the Indian government to send pig catchers to affected areas, distribute thousands of mosquito nets and spray insecticides.
 The delivery of millions of polio vaccines by the government will also help in the preparation of health agencies next year.
 Plans to deliver vaccines to the hardest-hit areas of the world this year have been delayed by a lack of funding and a low priority over other diseases.
 Slaney moved to Sweden in 1956, and three years later he began working at the Swedish Post Office, where he became chief sculptor.
 He has produced more than 1,000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries.
 "His work is of a high quality and is very detailed, and he is one of the few ""names"" in the business, and his work is collected by people who specialize in his work alone."
 His 1,000th stamp was a huge work by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, 'The Achievements of the Kings of Sweden', in 2000, which is now in the Guinness Book of Records.
 He has also been involved in the design of banknotes for other countries, most recently the $5 and $100 Canadian banknotes, which feature his portrait on the front.
 After the incident, Gibson was taken to the hospital but died a short time later.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the collision.
 The vehicle was moved from the scene of the accident at approximately 12:00 GMT the same day.
 "One man working at a nearby garage said, 'The kids who were waiting to cross the street were all screaming and crying.'"
 They all rushed to the scene of the accident.
 Other themes include saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in ways that are less polluting.
 The UN also expects to complete the funding of a fund to help countries affected by global warming.
 That money could go to flood-proof housing, water resource management, and crop diversity.
 Fluke wrote that some efforts to silence women's voices on women's health have backfired.
 She said that she came to this conclusion because she was overwhelmed by the positive comments and encouragement from both women and men who insist that contraceptives should be considered medically necessary.
 After the wounded were taken to hospital and the fighting stopped, about 40 inmates remained in the prison yard, refusing to return to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to straighten things out, but the prisoners' demands were not clear.
 Between 10 and 11 p.m. MDT (Mountain Daylight Time), prisoners started a fire in the prison yard.
 Soon, police equipped with riot gear entered the yard and used tear gas to corner the inmates.
 Firefighters finally extinguished the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 After the dam was built in 1963, seasonal flooding that deposited sediment throughout the river was eliminated.
 These deposits are essential to the creation of sand dunes and beaches that are used as wildlife habitats.
 As a result, two species of fish became extinct, and two others, including the humpback whale, are now endangered.
 The flood will raise the water level by a few feet, but officials are hoping that the sandbars that have been eroded downstream will be restored.
 No tsunami warning was issued, and according to the Jakarta Geophysical Institute, a magnitude 6.5 earthquake would not trigger a tsunami warning.
 Despite the lack of tsunami danger, residents began to panic and started leaving their businesses and homes.
 Although Winfrey was in tears at the farewell, she promised her fans that she would be back.
 "This is not a farewell. This is a beginning of a new chapter."
 The final results of the Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections showed that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba was re-elected by a large margin.
 The ruling South West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO) also retained its majority in the National Assembly.
 The allied and Afghan forces entered the area and secured it, while other allied aircraft were also sent to provide support.
 The collision occurred at a high altitude in mountainous terrain, and is believed to have been caused by an unexpected fire.
 Efforts to search for the crash site are hampered by bad weather and rough terrain.
 Medical charities, Médecins Sans Frontières and the World Health Organization say the outbreak is the worst the country has seen.
 "Doctors Without Borders spokesman Richard Veerman said: "Angola is in a very bad situation and the situation in Angola is still very bad."
 The game started at 10am in good weather, and apart from a slight drizzle in the morning, it was perfect for a seven-nation rugby tournament.
 Host nation South Africa, seeded fifth, made a comfortable start by beating 16th seeds Zambia 26-0.
 In the matches against the southern nations, South Africa was completely outclassed, but as the tournament progressed, they improved.
 Well-trained defensive skills, ball handling skills and great teamwork made them stand out and it was obvious to everyone that the team would win.
 Amsterdam city officials and the Anne Frank House say the tree is infected with fungus and is in danger of falling, posing a public health risk.
 It was due to be torn down on Tuesday but a court order prevented this.
 "All caves with the name 'Seven Sisters' have an entrance that is at least 100 to 250 metres (328 to 820 feet) in diameter."
 Infrared images show that the temperature of the cave is likely to change during the day and night.
 "They are cooler during the day and warmer at night than the surrounding surface."
 "These thermal excursions are not as stable as a large cave on the surface of the Earth that maintains a constant temperature, but they are consistent with deep holes in the surface," said Glen Cushing, a member of the USGS Astrogeology Team and Northern Arizona University's Flagstaff.
 Voting in France is traditionally a low-tech experience: voters are isolated in booths, and they put their pre-printed ballot into an envelope.
 After employees verify the voter's identity, the voter places the ballot in the ballot box and signs the poll book.
 French electoral law, on the contrary, rigorously codifies the procedure.
 Since 1988, the anonymous ballot box has been made transparent so that voters and supervisors can see that there are no other envelopes in the ballot box other than the one that contains the legally counted ballot of the registered voter.
 The candidate can send a representative to observe the entire election process. In the evening, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision, according to a specific procedure.
 The ASUS Eee PC, which was released worldwide for cost-cutting and functionality, became a hot topic at the Taipei IT Month in 2007.
 However, since ASUS received the 2007 Taiwan Sustainability Award from the Taiwanese government's Executive Yuan, the consumer market for notebook computers will be rapidly diversified and changed.
 The station's website describes the show as "a fresh, wild and crazy traditional radio theatre."
 Initially, the show was aired exclusively on TogiNet Radio, a tokusatsu-focused site and long-running internet radio station.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet established AstroNet Radio as a subsidiary broadcasting station.
 The show originally featured local amateurs from East Texas.
 With law enforcement officers not appearing in the city of Vichy, widespread looting continued overnight.
 "One eyewitness described the city of Bishkek as 'falling into anarchy' as people formed mobs and looted shops."
 Some Bishkek residents have denounced the illegal actions of protesters in the south.
 South Africa won the Rugby Union Tri-Nations match against the All Blacks (New Zealand) at the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa.
 The final score was 21–20, with the All Blacks winning their 15th consecutive test.
 The Springboks, meanwhile, have lost five games in a row.
 It was the final of the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final match of the series will be held at Ellis Park in Johannesburg next week when the Springboks play Australia.
 Monday at 10:08 p.m., the storm hit western Montana.
 The US Geological Survey and the National Earthquake Information Center had no immediate reports of damage.
 The epicenter of the quake was about 20 km (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and about 65 km (40 miles) south of Butte.
 A deadly strain of bird flu, H5N1, has been found in a dead wild duck in a marsh near Lyon, eastern France, the first time the virus has been detected in a wild bird in France.
 France is the seventh European country to be hit by the virus, after Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 Cases suspected of being H5N1 in Croatia and Denmark remain unconfirmed.
 "Chambers has accused God of 'death, destruction and millions of acts of terrorism' inflicted on 'millions of earthlings.'"
 "The atheist Chamberlain argued that his case was 'trivial' and that 'anyone could sue anyone else.'"
 "Camille Saint-Saens' story in the French opera, 'Samson et Dalila', is the story of an artist whose life was dominated by drugs and his love for Japan."
 As a result, performers are smoking marijuana on stage and the theater itself is encouraging audience participation.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann of Minnesota finished in fourth, fifth and sixth place, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but he was harsher in his criticism of Romney, who had run negative ads against Gingrich in Iowa.
 "Perry said he would return to Texas tonight to assess the results of the meeting and determine if there is a path forward for him in the race, but later said he would stay in the race and compete in the South Carolina primary on Jan. 21."
 Bachmann, who won the Ames Straw Poll in August, announced that she was suspending her campaign.
 The photographer was transported to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 "According to what is known, he is in his 20s. In a statement, Beaver said, "While I was not at the scene of the tragic event and have no direct connection to it, I offer my condolences and prayers to the families of the victims."
 The entertainment news website TMZ said the photographer had parked his car across the street from the Sephulveda home and continued to take pictures of the police station before crossing the street, prompting a California Highway Patrol officer to order him to back up twice.
 According to police, the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer is unlikely to face criminal charges.
 Only 18 medals are awarded per day, so not every country has a chance to stand on the podium.
 Yesterday's Super-G included 9th place Anna Jochemsen of the Netherlands in the women's standing class, and 10th place Katja Saarinen of Finland in the same event.
 Australia's Mitchell Gollan finished 11th in the men's standing super-G, while Czech competitor Oldrich Zelenyik finished 16th in the men's sitting super-G.
 Mexican gymnast Alyssa Baellaros finished 15th in the men's super-rotation floor exercise. New Zealand gymnast Adam Hol was 9th in the men's super-rotation floor exercise.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished 13th in the Super G, while South Korea's Park Jong-seok took 24th in the men's sitting Super G.
 The UN peacekeepers who arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake are being blamed for a disease outbreak that started near their base camp.
 According to the lawsuit, the UN camp did not properly disinfect waste, allowing bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Before the army came, Haiti had not had a health problem since 1800.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti cited an independent study that said Nepalese UN peacekeepers had inadvertently spread the disease to Haiti.
 Daniel Lantianu, a UN health expert, said the sharp rise was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Mr. Hamilton confirmed that Howard University Hospital had admitted a patient in stable condition.
 The patient had visited Nigeria, where the Ebola virus outbreak has occurred.
 The hospital followed infection control guidelines, including isolating patients from other people to prevent the spread of infection.
 Before The Simpsons, Simon worked in a variety of jobs on several shows.
 In the 1980s, he worked on programs such as Taxi, Cheers, and The Travis Walton Show.
 In 1989, he helped Brooks and Groening produce The Simpsons, and hired the show's first writing staff.
 He left the pro circuit in 1993, but retained the title of production manager and continued to receive millions of dollars in royalties each season.
 Earlier, China's Xinhua news agency reported that the plane had been hijacked.
 According to subsequent reports, the plane was returning to Kandahar after receiving a bomb threat.
 Early reports said the plane refused to land in Jermenki and was sent back to Afghanistan.
 Air accidents are common in Iran, both civilian and military, because of the ageing aircraft in both fleets, which are not well maintained.
 International sanctions meant that new aircraft purchases were not possible.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last month, an airplane bound for Armenia crashed in Iran, killing all 168 passengers on board, the worst air disaster in years.
 In the same month, another passenger plane left the runway at Mashhad airport and crashed into a wall, killing 17 people.
 Air Force One canceled the remaining concerts of the tour.
 The band was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 After lead singer Steven Tyler fell from the stage during a performance on August 5, the tour was canceled.
 Murray broke serve twice in the first set, but the two men traded service breaks to keep the set even.
 Del Potro got the first advantage in the second set, but after 6-6 it was necessary to take a time break again.
 Fortunately, he was able to return to the game after receiving treatment for his shoulder at the time.
 The program started at 8:30pm local time (15.00 UTC).
 Famous singers from all over the country sang the religious hymn, Bajan, in front of Shri Shyam's feet.
 Singer Sanjay Sharma opened the evening, followed by Jai Shankar Chowdhary. Chhappan Bhog also performed, along with singer Raju Kandelwal.
 And, Laca Sing led the way in singing the Bazan.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (a Hindu offering of 56 different foods, fruits, nuts, and dishes) were set before Baba Shyam.
 Laka Sing also performed Chupan Bazan, which was sung by the singer Raju Kandelwal with Laka Sing.
 In a keynote presentation at the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Nintendo president Satoru Iwata unveiled the design of the new Nintendo Revolution controller.
 Similar to a television remote control, the controller uses two sensors located near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 This allows players to move the device through the air and control its movements.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car early in the race and had to retire.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was leading most of the race, but had to retire after his front right wheel came loose.
 Michael Schumacher was beaten by Alonso by a tiny margin, due to suspension damage caused by numerous collisions during the race.
 "According to the transcript of the press conference, Jiang said, 'She is very cute and sings very well,'"
 "I was deeply moved every time I rehearsed this work."
 About three minutes after launch, a very large quantity of insulating foam was observed to be falling away from the external fuel tank.
 However, they are not thought to have caused damage to the space shuttle.
 "NASA's space shuttle program manager, N. Wayne Hale Jr., said the foam insulation fell off after "the period of time we were concerned about."
 About five minutes after the fireworks started, the wind suddenly started to blow. Then, a minute later, the wind was blowing at 70 km/h. Then it started to rain, but it was so big that it felt like needles were hitting my skin. Then it started to hail. People were in a panic, screaming and running around.
 "I lost my brother and his friend, and on the way I saw two disabled people in wheelchairs, and people pushing them," Armand Versace said.
 NHK also reported that Kashiwazaki-Kariwa Nuclear Power Plant in Niigata Prefecture is operating normally.
 Hokuriku Electric Power Company said the quake had no impact on its operations, and that the No. 1 and No. 2 reactors at the Shika nuclear power plant had been shut down.
 The 9,400 households in the area are said to be living without water, and about 100 households are said to be living without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged and train services were suspended in the affected areas, and Ishikawa Prefecture's Noto Airport was closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the governor's office.
 Three more bombs exploded near the government building in two hours.
 According to some reports, the official death toll was eight, while the official reports said up to 30 people were injured. The final death toll is not yet known.
 Urine samples from deceased pets that had consumed contaminated pet food were found to contain both cyanuric acid and melamine.
 The researchers found that the two compounds react with each other to form crystals, which can block the function of the kidneys.
 The researchers observed that the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid resulted in crystals forming in the cat's urine.
 The composition of these crystals, when compared with infrared spectroscopy (FTIR), matches the crystals found in the urine of the affected pet.
 As you may know, most goods from Central America enter the country duty-free.
 Even though eighty percent of our goods are taxed through customs in Central American countries, we treat you.
 That seemed unfair to me. It certainly wasn't fair.
 My point is that you treat us the way we treat you.
 Arnold Schwarzenegger, the governor of California, signed a bill that bans the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 "This bill requires violent video games sold in California to be labeled with a '18' rating, and imposes a $1,000 fine for selling these games to minors."
 The Attorney General, Keir Starmer QC, announced this morning that Huhne and Pryce will both be charged.
 Hoon resigned and was replaced in the Cabinet by Ed Davey, MP. Norman Lamb, MP, is expected to take over the Department of Business, which Hoon was due to vacate.
 Huhne and Pryce are due to appear in Westminster Magistrates' Court on February 16.
 The victims were Nicholas Olson, 25, and Zachary Cuddback, 21, who was the driver.
 Edgar Veguilla was wounded in the arm and jaw, and Kristoffer Schneider was injured in the face, requiring reconstructive surgery.
 Uka's weapon missed the fifth man's head, but Schindler was left with constant pain, lost an eye, had part of his skull removed and had his face reconstructed with titanium.
 Schnieder testified via video link from his home at the USAF base.
 Carpanedo, in addition to Wednesday's event, also competed in two individual races in the championship.
 Her first event was the slalom, where she did not finish the first run. Of the 116 competitors, 36 had the same result.
 In her other race, the Giant Slalom, she finished in 10th place with a combined time of 4:41.30, which was 2 minutes 11 seconds 60 behind the first-place finisher, Austria's Claudia Riegler, and 1 minute 9 seconds 2 behind the ninth-place finisher, Hungary's Gundi Daniel.
 The four female skiers who sat in the women's section did not make it to the finish line, and 45 of the 117 skiers in the competition were eliminated from the race.
 Madia Pradechi police recovered the stolen laptop and cell phone.
 "D K Arya, superintendent of police, said, 'We have arrested five men who raped the Swiss woman and also recovered her mobile phone and laptop.'"
 The names of the suspects are Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar, and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Chandrashekhar Solanki, the superintendent of police, said the defendant had come to court with his face covered.
 Three people were in the car when it crashed into the house, but none of them were injured.
 However, the driver suffered serious head injuries.
 The road where the collision occurred was closed temporarily, and the ambulance crew rescued the driver from the red Audi TT.
 At first he was admitted to James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adekoya is on trial in the Edinburgh court for the murder of his son.
 She is in custody awaiting trial, but because of her notoriety, witness testimony may have been biased.
 This is common practice in the rest of the UK, but Scottish law is different, and the court saw the publication of the photograph as potentially harmful.
 Pamela Ferguson, a professor at Dundee University, said: 'If journalists publish pictures of suspects, they are walking a tightrope.
 The Crown Office, which is responsible for overall prosecutions, told reporters there would be no further comment until the trial.
 According to the leaked document, the map would be based on the pre-1967 borders and would address the border dispute that Palestinians want.
 According to reports, other topics include the future of the holy city of Jerusalem for both countries and the Jordan Valley issue.
 Israel demanded that the current troops in the area be kept for 10 years, while the PA agreed that the troops would leave after five years.
 Hunters who participated in the additional pest control trials were closely supervised by forest managers because they were monitoring and evaluating the effectiveness of the trials.
 The partnership between the NPWS and the Australian Sports Shooter Association saw the hunting program recruit qualified volunteers under the Sports Shooter Association’s hunting program.
 According to Mike O'Flynn, acting Park Conservation and Heritage Manager for the NPWS, the four shooters selected for the first shoot were all given comprehensive safety and training guidance.
 Martelly took the oath of office yesterday for a nine-member provisional electoral council (CEP).
 Matelli is the fifth CEP in four years.
 Last month, the presidential commission recommended the resignation of the former CEP as part of a new electoral preparation.
 In response to the widespread anti-government protests that began in October, a commission was established by Martelly.
 Some of the violent resistance was sparked by the fact that some elections have not been held since 2011.
 About 60 cases of iPod overheating were reported, six fires occurred, and four people suffered minor burns.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it was aware of 27 accidents involving the device.
 "Last week, Japan's Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) announced that Apple had reported an additional 34 cases of overheating, which it deemed 'not serious.'"
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry said it was "really regrettable" that Apple had postponed the release of its report.
 The quake struck the Mariana Islands at 7:19 a.m. local time (9:19 p.m. GMT).
 The Northern Mariana Islands Emergency Management Agency said no damage was reported on a national level.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said there were no signs of a tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer hijacked a bus in Manila, the capital of the Philippines, and took tourists from Hong Kong as hostages.
 Rolando Menendez fired an M-16 rifle at tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued and at least six people were confirmed dead.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, were released early, along with Filipino photographers.
 Later, when an elderly woman needed to go to the bathroom, the photographers took her place. Menendez was shot.
 Riggs followed in his father's footsteps and went into medicine.
 He trained as a gynaecologist and began working at the National Women's Hospital in Auckland in 1959.
 Donghan Riggs, who works in a hospital, began to investigate preterm labor in his free time.
 His research showed that when the hormone was administered, the rate of lung maturation in the fetus was accelerated.
 Xinhua News Agency said government investigators recovered two flight data recorders, known as black boxes, on Wednesday.
 Other wrestling colleagues also paid tribute to Luna.
 "Tami Draymer said, "Luna was the Queen of Extreme. She was my first manager. Luna left the world on a full moon night. She was very special, like her. She was a strong woman."
 "Dustin 'Goldie' Runnels said, 'Luna was as weird as me... maybe weirder... I'm going to miss her... I'm going to love her... I hope she's in a better place.'"
 In a 2010 poll of 1,400 people, conducted in the lead up to the federal election, opposition to Australia becoming a republic increased by 8% from 2008.
 Julia Gillard, the prime minister, has argued during the 2010 federal election campaign that Australia should become a republic when Queen Elizabeth II's reign ends.
 In a poll, 34 percent said they would like Elizabeth II to be the last monarch of Australia.
 In a poll, 29 per cent of respondents thought Australia should become a republic quickly, while 31 per cent of respondents said Australia should not become a republic.
 The Olympic gold medallist was due to compete in the 100 m and 200 m freestyle events and the Commonwealth Games relay, but his fitness was in doubt due to illness.
 The drugs needed to overcome the pain were banned in the competition, so he couldn't take them.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer scientist at Central Missouri State University, has discovered the largest known prime number as of January 25.
 Several people used various hardware and software to validate the discovery, which was announced on Tuesday.
 Comets may have delivered the organic material that makes up proteins and sustains life, as well as the water that makes up the Earth.
 Scientists hope to understand how planets form, especially how the Earth formed, because a comet collided with the Earth long ago.
 Cuomo, 53, took office earlier this year and signed a bill last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 "He called the rumor 'political nonsense and nonsense.'"
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 According to the FAA, NextGen is a system that will allow aircraft to fly shorter routes, saving millions of gallons of fuel and reducing carbon emissions each year.
 This is in contrast to the previous use of ground-based radar technology, which allowed air traffic controllers to identify aircraft with a much lower degree of accuracy, and provided pilots with less accurate information.
 At Wembley, there will be no additional transport provided or surface train services stopping, and there will be no on-site parking or public transport interchange.
 Concerns about the lack of public transportation have led to the possibility of holding the game without spectators.
 A study published in the journal Science last Thursday announced that a new species of bird has formed on the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden have found that, despite the evolution of a new species in just two generations, the process was slowed down by the breeding between the local endemic finch, the medium ground finch, and the finch from the outside, the large cactus finch.
 Gold can be processed into all kinds of shapes. It can be rolled into very small shapes.
 It can be cut with a thin line, it can be bent or twisted, it can be beaten with a hammer or rolled with a sheet.
 "Gold can be made very thin and can be bonded to other metals. It was used to decorate hand-painted books, which were called "illuminated manuscripts."
 This is called the pH of the chemical, and you can make a scale using red cabbage juice.
 Cabbage juice changes color depending on how much chemicals are acidic or alkaline.
 pH level is the amount of hydrogen (H in pH) ions in a tested chemical.
 The hydrogen ion is the positively charged nucleus of the hydrogen atom (the hydrogen atom is composed of one proton and one electron).
 Dry the two powders together, then dip your clean hand in water and rub them into the ball.
 The moisture in your hands reacts with the outer layer, giving it an interesting texture and forming a kind of shell.
 Cities such as Harappa and Mohenjo-daro had elaborate sewage systems and flush toilets in almost every house.
 Archaeological remains of sewage systems have been found in houses in the Minoan cities of Santorini and Crete.
 Toilets were also found in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China. In Roman civilization, the toilet was sometimes part of a public bath, where both men and women would bathe together.
 If you're talking to someone thousands of miles away, you're using a satellite.
 Satellites in space receive the signal and almost immediately reflect it back.
 Satellites are launched into space by rockets. Scientists use telescopes in space because the Earth's atmosphere distorts our light and our view.
 To put satellites or telescopes into space, you need a super-sized rocket that is more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has changed the world in many ways, the greatest of which is that it has given us a more convenient and faster means of transportation.
 It brought trains and cars and many other forms of transportation.
 Below them are medium-sized animals such as rabbits, antelopes, and deer, which are hunted by medium-sized carnivores.
 Finally, there are many more small cats (including pet cats) that eat insects, rodents, lizards, birds, and other much smaller prey.
 The key to their success is the concept of each cat's specialty, which prevents them from competing with other cats, which is to exploit the gap.
 Lions are the most social of the cats, living in groups.
 The herd consists of one to three adult males, up to 30 females and their offspring.
 Females, because they come from large families with many sisters and daughters, have close relationships with each other.
 Lion prides behave in ways that are surprisingly similar to lions and other large cats, but also to wolf or dog packs, which can be extremely deadly to prey.
 Tigers are like versatile athletes, (not very good at it, but) they can climb high, swim, jump long distances, and can be pulled by a human five times their own weight.
 Tigers are solitary animals, except for the four-membered family of lions, tigers, leopards and jaguars, which can roar.
 The roar of the tiger is different from the roar of the lion, but it is similar to the phrase of the word that is grumbling and roaring.
 Ocelots are carnivores, and prefer to eat small animals, preferably those smaller than themselves, such as monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Scientists think that ocelots use smell to track down their prey, and then to find them again.
 Ocelots are nocturnal, meaning they are active at night and can see well in the dark. They are also very stealthy, and hunt by stalking their prey and then pouncing on it.
 When a small population of organisms becomes separated from the main group from which it originated (by moving to a mountain or river, or by being carried to a new island where it cannot easily move), they realize that they are in a different environment from where they were before.
 In this new environment, with different resources and competitors, new populations need to have different characteristics or adaptations in order to be competitive.
 The original population has not changed at all, but the same adaptation is still required.
 As time went on and new people started to adapt to the new environment, they began to look more and more different from the others.
 After all, in thousands or even millions of years, the two groups would be so different that they would not be called the same species.
 We call this process speciation, which means the formation of new species. Speciation is an inevitable consequence of evolution and is a key part of evolution every week.
 Plants make the oxygen that humans breathe, and they absorb the carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants use photosynthesis to make their own food and also provide shade.
 We build houses out of wood and clothe ourselves with plants. Most of the food we eat is vegetables. Without plants, animals could not survive.
 Mosasaurus was the top predator of its time, so there was nothing to fear except other mosasaurus.
 The long jaws were filled with more than 70 very sharp teeth, and there were additional teeth in the palate, which meant that no one could pass through without being bitten.
 It is not known for sure, but it may have had a forked tongue. It ate turtles, large fish, other mosasaurids, and may have even eaten human flesh.
 This animal attacked anything that came into the water, even the giant dinosaurs.
 Their food was generally familiar to us, but among the banquet fare of the Romans were some unusual and strange things like wild boar, peacock, snails, and dormice.
 Another difference was that the poor and women sat on chairs and ate, while the rich men liked to recline on couches and eat together.
 Ancient Roman meals could not have included food from the United States or Asia, even centuries later.
 For example, they didn't eat corn, tomatoes, potatoes, or cocoa, and no ancient Romans ever tasted turkey.
 The Babylonians built a temple for the main god they believed in, which they called the 'House of God'.
 People would bring offerings to the gods, and priests would try to meet the demands of the gods through rituals and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard and an inner sanctum, which only the priests could enter.
 Sometimes pyramid-shaped towers, called ziggurats, were built to be part of a temple.
 The very top of the tower is a special place for God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 The life of the Hebrew family was almost entirely out of doors.
 Women cooked in the yard, shops were just stalls on the street, and stones were used to build houses.
 There were no large forests in Canaan, so wood was very expensive.
 Greenland was sparsely settled. In Norwegian adventure stories, they say that Erik the Red was banished from Iceland for murder, and when he sailed further west, he discovered Greenland and named it Greenland.
 Regardless of his discovery, the Eskimo tribes were already living there at the time.
 Each country belonged to 'Scandinavia', but the people of Denmark, Sweden, Norway, and Iceland, the kings, customs, and history were very different.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think the back of the Declaration of Independence has a treasure map written on it.
 But that's not true. Even if there's something written on the back of the paper, it's not a treasure map.
 "The back of the Declaration of Independence has the words 'Original Declaration of Independence, July 4, 1776' written on it, upside down and backward."
 Who wrote it is unknown, but the large parchment document (75.6 cm x 62.2 cm) was rolled up and stored early on.
 So it's likely that it was simply labeled as a label.
 The D-Day landings and subsequent battles liberated northern France, but the south remained in German hands.
 "It was under the rule of Vichy France, which was a collaborationist regime that sided with the Germans rather than fighting them."
 "On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded southern France, an operation called Operation Dragoon. "
 In just two weeks, the Allied forces had liberated southern France and were turning their attention to Germany.
 Civilization is a very large group of people working and living together, a single culture shared by a society.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, which means "citizen," from civis, which means "citizen," and from civitas, which means "city" or "city state."
 The city-state can be considered the pioneer of the nation. Civilization culture means the transmission of knowledge over generations, the survival and fair distribution of cultural footprints.
 A few cultures have left no significant historical evidence and are not treated as civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen colonies formed a confederation under the Articles of Confederation, which created a weak central government with Congress as the sole legislative body.
 Congress had no power to tax, and there was no national executive or judicial branch, so laws were often enforced by cooperative state authorities.
 Congress also had no power to nullify state tax laws or tariffs.
 These amendments required unanimous consent of all the states, and most of the state delegates, who ignored the central government, boycotted the convention.
 The Italian national football team, along with the German national football team, is the second most successful team in the world, having won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, baseball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey, and F1 car racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the north, and Italian athletes sometimes compete in international events or the Olympics.
 Japan has almost 7,000 islands (the largest being Honshu), making it the seventh largest island in the world!
 "The group of islands that Japan possesses/has because of the group of islands/islands, because of the geographical position, is often called the ""Archipelago""."
 Taiwan began when sailors from Europe, passing through in the 15th century, called the island Ilha Formosa, or beautiful island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base in southwestern Taiwan, and brought about a change in the production of grain, hiring Chinese laborers to produce rice and sugar through a system of re-farming.
 In 1683, the Qing Dynasty (1644-1912) conquered the western and northern coastal regions of Taiwan and declared Taiwan a part of the Qing Empire in 1885.
 After losing the First Sino-Japanese War (1894–1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, which ceded Taiwan to Japan and allowed the island to be ruled by Japan until 1945.
 Machu Picchu is made up of three main structures, namely, Intiwatana, the Temple of the Sun, and the Temple with three windows.
 Most of the buildings on the edge of the park have been rebuilt to allow tourists to better understand the original appearance.
 In 1976, 30% of Machu Picchu was restored, and restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most common still image format in the world is 35mm, which was the film size used primarily at the end of the analog film era.
 It is still produced today, but more importantly, its aspect ratio was inherited by digital camera image sensor formats.
 A little confusing, but the 35mm format is actually 36mm wide by 24mm high.
 So the aspect ratio of this format (the simplest integer ratio to get is 12:9).
 Several common formats (such as APS format) are the same or very similar to this aspect ratio.
 The much-abused and often derided rule of thirds is a simple guideline for maintaining the order of an image while creating dynamism.
 This law states that the most effective position for the main subject is where the lines that divide the image into thirds vertically and horizontally intersect.
 During this period of European history, the wealthy and powerful Catholic Church was thoroughly investigated.
 For more than a thousand years, Christianity bound European nations together despite differences in language and custom.
 Its pervasive power affects everyone from the king to the peasant.
 One of the main tenets of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and that the church's treasury is in existence for that very reason.
 The church's central power had been in Rome for more than a millennium, and the concentration of power and wealth raised questions about the legitimacy of this doctrine.
 Immediately after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began a naval blockade of Germany.
 Although such blockades violated international law, which was generally accepted by several international conventions of the last two centuries, the strategy proved effective in cutting off vital military and civilian supplies.
 The British had mined the high seas to prevent any ship from entering any of the maritime zones, thus putting even neutral ships at risk.
 Because the response to this tactic was limited, Germany expected a similar response in an unrestricted submarine war.
 In the 1920s, the prevailing mood among most citizens and most nations was pacifism and isolationism.
 The nations that had experienced the horrors of the First World War prayed that they would never again have to go through such a situation.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States to work for the Edison Company in New York City.
 He (the former manager of his job) brought a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor to Thomas Edison, a letter of recommendation and four cents, the entire property, to the United States.
 In ancient China, there were different ways of indicating different eras, and each era or dynasty was distinguished by the ruling family.
 There were also periods of disunity between the various dynasties, most notably the 60-year period between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 During this period, there were many wars between the nobles who were fighting for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms period was one of the bloodiest in Chinese history, with thousands of people fighting to the death for the highest seats in the Sian Palace.
 The use of the metric system, the transition from an absolute monarchy to a republic, the rise of nationalism and the idea that the nation is the property of the people rather than of a single ruler, all had a profound effect on society and politics.
 Also, after the revolution, jobs were open to all male applicants, opening the way for the most ambitious and success-oriented people to succeed.
 Because of the current system of military rank based on merit rather than class, the same system is applied to the military.
 The French Revolution also inspired workers in other countries who were oppressed to take matters into their own hands.
 Muhammad was deeply interested in matters beyond this worldly life, and he often used a cave known as Hira on Mount Noor (Light) for meditation.
 The cave, which has withstood the ravages of time, is a clear indication of Muhammad's religious orientation.
 Situated at the top of one of the mountains in the north of Mecca, the cave is completely isolated from the rest of the world.
 In fact, even if you know it exists, it's not easy to find it, because once you're inside the cave, you're completely isolated.
 The only thing visible from the cave is the clear blue sky, and nothing from the outside can be seen or heard.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one of the Seven Wonders of the World that still exists.
 The Great Pyramid, built by the Egyptians in the 3rd century B.C., is one of the many large pyramid structures built to honor the dead pharaohs.
 "The Giza Plateau, or Giza Necropolis, in the Valley of the Kings in Egypt, contains several pyramids (the Great Pyramid being the largest), several smaller tombs, several temples, and the Sphinx."
 The Great Pyramid was built to honor Pharaoh Khufu, and the smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to honor Khufu's wife and family.
 The "upstroke" mark is a V-shaped mark, and the "downstroke" mark is a square without a staple or bottom.
 The Olimi starts at the end of the bow and ends at the arrow, while the Nerim starts at the arrow and ends at the arrow rest.
 The upstroke usually makes a softer sound, while the downstroke makes a stronger, more confident sound.
 You can draw your own mark with a pencil, but the bow mark is for the purpose of music, so it is usually kept.
 The terrified French king Louis XVI, Marie Antoinette and their two young children (11-year-old Marie Thérèse and 4-year-old Louis Charles) and the king's sister, Princess Elizabeth, were forced to leave Versailles for Paris by a mob of women workers on October 6, 1789.
 The king and queen returned to Paris in a carriage surrounded by crowds who shouted and threatened them.
 The crowd forced the king and queen to open the windows of their carriage.
 At one point, a member of the mob waved the head of the murdered royal guard in front of the terrified queen at Versailles.
 The cost of the U.S. imperialist war to conquer the Philippines was paid for by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U.S. colonial government to pay for a large portion of their expenses, and bonds in the name of the Philippine government were sold through Wall Street banks.
 Of course, the super-profits derived from the long-term exploitation of the Filipino people will constitute the basic profit of U.S. imperialism.
 To understand the Templars, we must understand the context in which they were created.
 The time of the incident is usually referred to as the Middle Ages, which is the period from the 11th to the 13th century (1000-1300).
 The late Middle Ages, which preceded the early modern period, and the early modern period, which followed the late Middle Ages, are conventionally considered to end around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a broad term encompassing a range of substantive ideas, from the technologically oriented or technological imperative to the more fundamental idea that human destiny is shaped by the laws of science and technology.
 "Most interpretations of technological determinism have two concepts: that technological development itself has an influence beyond culture or politics, and that technology is not socially controlled, but rather has a "natural" influence on society."
 For example, someone might argue that cars have led to the development of roads.
 However, a national road network is not cost-effective for a few cars, so a new production method is developed to reduce the cost of owning a car.
 Also, when many people own vehicles, the number of road accidents increases, which in turn leads to new technological advances in the field of medical services to repair damaged bodies.
 Romanticism had many elements of cultural determinism, influenced by writers such as Goethe, Schiller, and Schlegel.
 From a romantic perspective, geography shaped the individual, and as time passed, the customs and cultures associated with that geography grew, and these grew socially cohesive, and in the end, it was better than making arbitrary laws.
 While Paris is known as the fashion capital of the modern era, Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of feudal Europe.
 The reputation of the source of luxury began in the year 400 and lasted until the year 1100.
 By the 12th century, Constantinople's prestige had declined, largely because crusaders returned with gifts such as silk and spices that were more valuable than the goods sold in Byzantine markets.
 At this time, the fashion capital moved from Constantinople to Paris.
 The Gothic style reached its peak in the 10th-11th centuries and in the 14th century.
 Early dresses were heavily influenced by the Byzantine culture of the East.
 However, because the exchange of information was slow, the Western style could be 25 to 30 years behind.
 At the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop its own style. One of the greatest advances of that time was that people began to use buttons to fasten their clothes.
 Subsistence farming is farming that is done by farmers and their families to produce only enough food to meet their needs.
 Subsistence agriculture is a simple, organic system that uses the native seeds of an ecological region to maximize the yield of a crop through rotation or other relatively simple techniques.
 Historically, most farmers have been subsistence farmers, and this is still true in many developing countries.
 Subculture allows people who feel alienated by society to gather together and create their own identity.
 Subcultures may be distinguished by age, ethnicity, class, location, and/or gender of the members.
 The defining characteristics of a subculture are linguistic, aesthetic, religious, political, sexual, and geographic, and may include any combination of these.
 Members of subcultures often express their sense of belonging through a unique and symbolic style that includes fashion, mannerisms, and specific slang.
 One of the most common ways of demonstrating the importance of socialization is to use the case of a few unfortunate children who, for reasons such as neglect, misfortune, or deliberate abuse, have not been socialized by adults during their growth.
 These children are called "feral children." Some feral children are confined, often by their parents, who are unable to accept their children's severe mental or physical disabilities.
 Wild children may have experienced severe child abuse or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Some children are claimed to have been raised by animals, and some children are said to have lived in the wild by themselves.
 When animals are raised by non-human animals, the wild animal behaves much like an animal that needs special care, such as fear of humans or indifference.
 Project-based learning makes learning easier and more interesting, and scaffolding takes it one step further.
 Scaffolding is more like a tutor than a method. It provides help to people learning new things, such as using a new computer program or starting a new project.
 The metaphor can be both virtual and real, which means that the teacher is a form of the metaphor, but so is the little paper clip in Microsoft Office.
 The virtual structure is built into the software and is designed to prompt, prompt, and explain procedures that students might otherwise have difficulty handling on their own.
 The reasons why a child is placed in foster care vary widely, from neglect to abuse and even kidnapping.
 All children should grow up in a nurturing, protective, and educational environment, but that is not the case.
 We consider the foster care system to be a safe haven for these children.
 Our foster care system will provide a safe home, a caring foster parent, a stable education, and reliable health care.
 Foster care must be able to provide all the essential elements that the existing family could not.
 The Internet has both a collective and a personal communications component.
 The distinctive characteristics of the Internet are carried forward into additional dimensions in terms of access and satisfaction.
 "For example, 'learning' and 'socialization' have been suggested as important motivations for Internet use (James et al., 1995)."
 In their study of viewer reactions to Web sites, Aaker and McArdle (1998) identified "personal involvement" and "continuing relationship" as new motivational dimensions.
 By using video recordings, we were able to make important discoveries about the interpretation of subtle facial expressions and movements that lasted only a few milliseconds.
 In particular, it claims to be able to accurately interpret subtle facial expressions to determine whether a person is lying.
 Oliver Sacks, in his book, "The President's Speech," noted that despite his brain damage, people accurately perceived the sincerity of his words.
 He even suggested that pets, like dogs, have the ability to analyze human behavior.
 Twentieth-century research has identified two hidden or apparent genetic variants.
 Mutations create new genes for new species, and selection removes the expressed genes from the population.
 Separation and recombination shuffles the mutations that occur between each generation among the two gene pools.
 In the savannah, primates with digestive systems similar to humans have difficulty meeting their amino acid requirements from the plant resources available.
 And failure to do so can lead to serious consequences, including stunted growth, malnutrition and, ultimately, death.
 The easiest plant resources to access are leaves or legumes, but these are difficult for us primates to digest without cooking.
 In contrast, animal foods such as ants, termites, and eggs provide high-quality protein with essential amino acids that are easily digested.
 "Given all the circumstances, it's not surprising that our ancestors solved the 'protein problem' in the same way that chimpanzees in the savannah do today."
 Sleep disturbance is the process of deliberately waking up during a normal sleep period and then falling asleep again after a short period of time (10–60 minutes).
 This can be done easily by using a relatively quiet alarm clock to wake you up without fully rousing your consciousness.
 If you turn off your alarm clock while you are asleep, you can put the clock in a far corner of the room so that you will have to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other biological rhythm-based options include forcing the patient to drink large amounts of water (especially water or diuretics) before bed and to urinate.
 The amount of calmness a person possesses is related to the amount of insecurity that is inherent in his body and soul.
 The more you relax, the more positive energy you will have in your life. Everyone has the ability to find absolute peace and contentment.
 Anyone can have an epiphany; the only barrier to this goal is our own inner anxiety and negative tendencies.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but it has been expanded upon by the Mahayana Buddhist notion of love and many techniques from Indian yoga.
 Tibetan Buddhism is, in theory, very simple: it is composed of Kundalini yoga, meditation and the path of love that embraces all.
 When you practice Kundalini Yoga, the energy of Kundalini awakens through the yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras and visualizations.
 At the heart of Tibetan meditation is Deity Yoga, which visualizes various deities to cleanse energy channels, activate chakras, and create enlightenment rituals.
 In World War II, Germany was a common enemy, which led to cooperation between the Soviet Union and the United States. The end of the war, and the clash of systems, changes and cultures, led to the decline of several countries.
 Two years later, the former allies became enemies and the Cold War began.
 The Cold War would last another 40 years and become a real fight between proxy armies in Africa, Asia, Afghanistan, Cuba, and many other places.
 By 17 September 1939, the Polish defenses had already collapsed, and the only hope was to retreat along the Romanian bridgehead and regroup.
 However, these plans were rendered useless when over 800,000 Soviet troops invaded eastern Poland in violation of the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact and other international treaties (bilateral and multilateral) and entered Belarusian and Ukrainian fronts, creating the Belorussian and Ukrainian Fronts.
 Shipping goods by sea is the most efficient way to move large numbers of people and large amounts of goods across the ocean.
 The Navy's mission is traditionally to transport people and goods, but also to prevent the enemy from doing so.
 One of the most notable recent cases was the North Atlantic campaign of World War II. The Americans tried to cross the Atlantic to help the British, moving manpower and resources.
 At the same time, the German Navy, which used U-boats primarily, tried to prevent this operation.
 If the Allies had failed, Germany would have been able to conquer the rest of Europe and perhaps even the United Kingdom.
 Sheep farming is thought to have begun in the Zagros Mountains of Iran about 10,000 years ago.
 Ancient civilizations and tribes began to keep them to make it easier to use milk, wool, meat and leather.
 Sheep are usually kept in herds on hillsides or in pasture, often under the care of a shepherd, usually a child or adolescent. This method of herding is still used today.
 The M25 was built in the early 1980s.
 The road was made of parallel wooden planks, but it was still faster than the rougher roads of the time and could carry more weight.
 To fix the rails, ties were introduced quite early. But as the rails were placed on top of the iron ties, it was found to be more efficient.
 This became a common practice, but iron made the wooden wheels of the chariots more susceptible to wear.
 As time went on, wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels, and in 1767, the first railroad was finally introduced.
 The first known means of transportation for humans was walking, and with the appearance of Homo erectus 2 million years ago, humans began to walk upright.
 Their ancestors, the Australopithecus, did not habitually walk upright like them.
 Sahelanthropus may have been bipedal as early as 7 million years ago, but the best-preserved example of bipedalism is in the fossil of Australopithecus, which appeared between 4.2 and 3.9 million years ago.
 We can start living more environmentally friendly lives, and we can join the environmental movement, and we can also become activists to reduce the suffering we will experience in the future.
 This is similar to symptomatic treatment in many cases, but in order to not be a temporary solution, the root of the problem must be found and that part deactivated.
 The world has changed a lot with the advancement of human science and technology, and the problem has become more serious because of overpopulation and the luxurious lifestyle of human beings.
 After the Congress adopted it on July 4, the president of the Congress, John Hancock, and the secretary, Charles Thomson, signed it and sent it to the nearby printing shop of John Dunlap.
 That night, 150 to 200 copies of what is now called the Dunlap Broadside were printed.
 On July 8, 1976, the document was first read aloud in front of the Independence Hall by John Nixon.
 One was sent to George Washington on July 6, and he read it to his troops in New York on July 9. A copy arrived in London on August 10.
 The 25 dunlap broadsides that are still known to exist are the oldest surviving copies of this document; the handwritten originals no longer exist.
 Many paleontologists today believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and have lived on to the present day. We call them birds.
 Many people do not think of birds as dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But there are still many things that make birds look like dinosaurs.
 They have scales on their feet, lay eggs, and walk on two back legs like Tyrannosaurus.
 Most computers in use today use binary encoding to manipulate information.
 Binary numbers can have only one of two values (0 or 1), and these numbers are called bits in computer jargon.
 Internal poisoning may not manifest itself immediately. Symptoms such as vomiting are so common that they cannot be diagnosed immediately.
 The most obvious sign of poisoning is a container of medication or household chemicals that is open and unattended.
 Check the table for specific emergency instructions for specific poisons.
 The term insect is a term entomologists use to refer to these types of insects with a certain amount of formality.
 The term was derived from the parasitic insect, the bedbug, which has been known since ancient times.
 The carpet beetle and the bed bug are both chronic insects, adapting to their host's habitat or living quarters.
 Multiple sclerosis, the most common neurological disease of young and middle-aged adults, affects an estimated 400,000 people across the United States.
 Multiple sclerosis (MS) is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which is made up of the brain, spinal cord, and peripheral nerves.
 Women are twice as likely as men to develop multiple sclerosis, according to a new study.
 The couple may decide that raising a child is not in their best interest or for the good of the child.
 These couples may choose to adopt a child.
 In the adoption process, the biological parents give up their parental rights so that another couple can raise the child.
 The main purpose of science is to understand how the world works through the scientific method, which is the way most scientific research is conducted.
 However, experiments are meant to eliminate one or more hypotheses, to ask questions, to make observations, and to lead to scientific investigation.
 Scholars and philosophers focused on classical texts and especially the Latin Bible.
 In psychology and science in general, Aristotle's view of all matter was accepted.
 With the decline of knowledge of Greek, the West became disconnected from the roots of Greek philosophy and science.
 Many rhythms observed in physiology and behavior are critically dependent on the existence of a biological clock and endogenous cycles.
 Most living organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals, have a cyclic rhythm, not simply a response to external periodic signals.
 The biological clock is a self-maintaining oscillator that can continue to run even when there are no signals coming from the outside.
 Hersh and Chase's experiment was one of the leading studies that suggested DNA was a genetic material.
 Hersh and Chase used phage, or viruses, to infect the bacteria with their own DNA.
 They did two experiments: one to check for DNA in the pahaz, and one to check for protein in the pahaz when it was radioactive.
 Mutations can have a variety of effects, depending on the type of variation, the importance of the affected genetic segment, and whether the affected cells are germline cells.
 Mutations in reproductive cells can only be passed on to offspring, and mutations elsewhere can cause cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism involves people who are interested in nature hiking to view landscapes, including plants and wildlife.
 Examples of field activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, and research on parks and ecosystems.
 A trip to Borneo's Orangutan Island, a photo, a lesson, etc. are one example.
 Every morning, people leave their small rural towns in their cars to go to work, passing the places where the people they just left are going to work.
 This dynamic transportation shuttle connects and supports everyone with a car-based transportation system in some way.
 Now, scientific data show that this carbon economy, on a vast scale, has pushed the biosphere out of the stable state that helped human evolution for the last two million years.
 Everyone participates in society, uses the transportation system, and almost everyone complains about the transportation system.
 In developed countries, there are few complaints about water quality or bridge collapses.
 Why do transport systems provoke such frustration, and why do they so often fail to live up to expectations? Are transport engineers all incompetent? Or is there something more fundamental going on?
 Traffic flow is the study of the movement of individual drivers and vehicles and the interactions they have with each other at two points in time.
 Unfortunately, it is not possible to predict the driver's behavior 100% accurately, so it is difficult to study traffic flow.
 Fortunately, drivers tend to behave within a fairly consistent range, so traffic flow has some reasonable consistency and can be roughly described mathematically.
 To better represent the flow of traffic, three key characteristics were established between (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) speed.
 These relationships help in the planning, design and operation of road facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to be able to fly in the air. The ability to fly helped insects to escape predators more easily and find food and mates more efficiently.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings behind them.
 This provides them with a wider range of smaller places to hide from predators.
 Today, insects that cannot fold their wings are only bedbugs and flies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus claimed that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 Some people believed that he was right about the solar system (and other stars) being geocentric, but many did not.
 The earth seems to be moving, but it is not.
 The Amazon River is the second longest river in the world by length and the largest by volume, carrying more than eight times the flow of the next largest river.
 The Amazon is also the largest river in the world, sometimes as wide as six miles.
 Twenty percent of the water that flows from the rivers of the earth into the sea comes from the Amazon.
 The main Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 mi) long, and its drainage basin is fed by thousands of smaller rivers.
 Pyramid building continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, but neither in size nor in technical excellence did it ever surpass the Pyramids of the Fourth Dynasty.
 The ancient Egyptians of the New Kingdom were amazed by the monumental buildings of their ancestors, which were built more than 1,000 years before their time.
 The Vatican City State has a population of about 800 people, the smallest independent state in the world and the smallest country by population.
 The Vatican City uses Italian for legislation and official communications.
 Italian is also a daily language, unlike Latin, which is used in religious ceremonies, and is spoken by most people working in the region.
 All citizens of the Vatican City are Roman Catholic.
 People have known about basic chemical elements such as gold, silver, copper since ancient times, because they are all found in nature in their natural form and can be extracted with primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle theorized that all matter was made up of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 This was similar to the four states of matter, solid, liquid, gas, and plasma (in that order), but Aristotle also theorized that they were transformed into new elements that make up what we see.
 Alloys are basically a mixture of two or more metals, remember that there are many elements on the periodic table.
 Elements like calcium and potassium are considered metals, as are the metals gold and silver.
 There are also alloys that contain some non-metals, such as carbon.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter. All matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so tiny that there are a few million of them in the period at the end of this sentence.
 So, the pencil came into being and the pencil has remained a good tool for many people.
 Unfortunately, the advent of a newer writing style has led to less use of pencils, and pencils have been pushed to a lesser position.
 Now people don't need to get close to a pencil sharpener to write messages on a computer screen.
 People are wondering what the keyboard will look like if something new is created.
 Nuclear fission bombs are based on the principle that a large amount of energy is required to combine a nucleus with a large number of protons and neutrons.
 It's like lifting a heavy wagon up a hill. When you split the nucleus again, some of the energy is released.
 Some atoms have unstable nuclei, which means that they have a tendency to split on their own, without any external influence or condition.
 "The surface of the Moon is made of rock and dust, and the outer layer of the Moon is called the crust."
 The crust is about 70 km thick near the surface and about 100 km thick at the deepest part.
 The crust is thinner under Maria and thicker under the oceans.
 The crust is thinner, so there may be more maria near the surface, where magma is more likely to rise.
 Content theory focuses on what causes people to behave in a certain way or what causes them to behave in a certain way.
 These theories imply that people have certain needs or needs that are internalized until they become adults.
 These theories look at who specific people are and what their environment does to make them want to do what they do.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 Typically, the two behaviors can appear as a manager starts to lead a former colleague: trying to stay ""one of the guys"" at one end of the spectrum.
 Managers of this type are not well-liked by people, make unpopular decisions, give out punishments, assess work, and assign responsibilities, and have difficulty holding people accountable.
 At the other end of the spectrum, the team member becomes an unconscious individual who believes that he or she must change everything that has been done and make it his or her own way.
 Ultimately, the team's success depends on the leader.
 Such behavior causes confusion among the pack leader and the members.
 Virtual teams maintain the same standards of excellence as traditional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as a contact point for the real members.
 They often have more autonomy than the traditional team members because they can meet with the teams at different times that are not understood by the local management team.
 "The existence of a ""true"" transparency team (Larsen and Rapaport, 1989, 109) is also a unique component of the virtual team. "
 The ""invisible team"" is the management team to which each member reports. This team sets the standards for each member.
 Why does it take so long for organizations to establish learning communities? One goal of putting the organizational learning concept into practice is innovation.
 When all available resources are used efficiently in the organization's business units, creativity and originality can flourish.
 As a result, the process of organizations working together to overcome obstacles can lead to new innovative processes to meet customer needs.
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must create not only an innovation culture but also a culture of shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) describes an approach called Continuum to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological data provides the necessary empirical evidence when a theoretical approach is taken to the study of cognitive abilities, narrowing the field of study and making it more precise.
 Correlations between brain pathology and behavior are helping scientists in their research.
 Different types of brain damage, trauma, tumors, and tumors affect behavior and cause changes in some mental functions, which has been known for a long time.
 The advent of new technologies has made it possible to observe and investigate brain structure and function in ways that were not possible before.
 This provides a lot of information and data for creating simulation models that help us understand the inner workings of the brain.
 AI conjures up images of science fiction, but it is a very important area of computer science that deals with the behavior, learning, and intelligent adaptation of computers.
 AI research includes work aimed at automating tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 For example, it includes writing, voice, face recognition, as well as control, planning, scheduling and customer diagnostics and answering questions.
 These became separate disciplines that focused on solving problems that arose in everyday life.
 AI systems are now being used frequently in the current economic, medical, engineering and military fields, as seen in many home computers and video game software.
 Field trips are a big part of every classroom. Teachers generally want to take their students to places that do not require a bus trip.
 Technology helps with virtual field trips, where students can view museum exhibits, visit an aquarium, or view beautiful works of art while sitting in a classroom.
 Virtual field trips are a great way to reflect on field trips and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, each year Bennett's students from North Carolina design a website about the state's capital city, and each year the website is redesigned, with the previous version archived on an online server.
 Blogging also helps students improve their writing. Students often start blogs with poor grammar and spelling, but the presence of readers usually changes those things.
 Most students are the most critical audience, so bloggers try to improve their writing to avoid criticism.
 "Blogs also serve as a way to ""engage students in their own learning"" and ""to engage students in the learning of others"" (Totoro, 2004)."
 Blogging is a tool to foster cooperation and encourage students to extend their learning beyond the traditional school day.
 "Appropriate use of blogs is to ""respond to Internet resources actively, thereby promoting students' analytical and critical thinking and allowing students to define their own position in other people's writings and establish their own perspective on a particular topic (Oravec, 2020)."
 Ottawa is Canada's charming capital city, where the use of two languages is common, and the city's many art galleries and museums illuminate Canada's past and present.
 In the south, there is the Niagara Falls, and in the north, there are Muskoka and other untouched natural beauties.
 All these things make Ontario stand out as the true Canada.
 The northern part of the country is sparsely populated, and some areas are almost uninhabited wilderness.
 A population comparison that will surprise many: African Americans living in the United States outnumber Canadians.
 The islands of East Africa lie along the eastern coast of Africa and in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is currently the largest and most unique continent in terms of wildlife.
 Most of the smaller islands are independent or associated with France and are known for their luxurious beach resorts.
 Islam was also transmitted through the Arabs, and there were great changes in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when Portuguese explorer Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape Route from Europe to India.
 The north is Sahel, the south and west are the Atlantic Ocean.
 Women: All female travelers are encouraged to answer that they are married, whether or not they are.
 Wearing a ring can also help (but expensive-looking rings are best avoided).
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can result in what is perceived as harassment and that acts such as touching a woman's arm are not uncommon.
 Don't be afraid to say no to men and stand up for yourself (cultural differences aside, harassment is not to be overlooked!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded in the 10th century by Berber fishermen, and later used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans, and the Merinids.
 The Portuguese rebuilt it, calling it Casa Branca, but after the earthquake of 1755 they abandoned it and moved to a new location.
 The sultan of Morocco rebuilt the city as Daru l-Badya, and the Spanish traders who settled here called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the least interesting shopping places in Morocco.
 In the old Medina, you can easily find places selling traditional Moroccan products such as tajines, pottery, leather goods, water pipes and various kinds of goods, but they are all for tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city located in the eastern part of the Democratic Republic of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was devastated by lava from the Nyiragongo volcano, which covered much of the town, including its roads.
 Goma is quite safe, but if you are visiting Goma from outside, you should do some research to understand the ongoing conflict in North Kivu.
 The city is also the base camp for the cheapest mountain gorilla trekking in Africa and the Nyiragongo volcano.
 You can use a moto-taxi to get around Goma. The regular (local) price is 500 Congolese francs for a short ride.
 By combining the meaning of 'Timbuktu' with the meaning of 'impossible', the term became a metaphor for a distant, exotic place.
 Today, Timbuktu is a poor town, but it has become a tourist attraction because of its fame and has an airport.
 Due to the effects of desert sand, Timbuktu was added to the list of endangered world heritage sites in 1990.
 It was one of the most important expeditions in Henry Louis Gates' PBS series, "African Odyssey."
 The city is more Arab than African, and stands in stark contrast to the rest of Mali.
 Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in the northeastern part of South Africa, bordered to the east by Mozambique, to the north by Zimbabwe, and to the south by the Crocodile River.
 The park covers an area of 19,500 km² and is divided into 14 different zones, each of which supports a different wildlife.
 It is one of South Africa's flagship national parks, and is one of the country's most popular tourist destinations.
 Like all South African national parks, there is a conservation levy and entrance fee to the park.
 It may be worthwhile to buy a wild card to enter a specific park in South Africa or the entire South African National Parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the place where the name Hong Kong was given to the territory and where most tourists focus their attention.
 The skyline of Hong Kong is a shimmering graph, because the line of buildings that make up the skyline are reflected in the water of Victoria Harbour.
 For the best views in Hong Kong, leave Hong Kong Island and head to the Kowloon waterfront on the opposite side of the harbor.
 Most of the development of Hong Kong's landmass has been concentrated on reclaimed land along the northern coast.
 This is where British colonial developers made their mark, so if you're looking for evidence of the former colonial territory, this is a good place to start.
 Sundarbans is the largest continuous mangrove forest in the world, stretching 260 km (160 mi) from the coast of Bangladesh to the Sunderbans National Park in India.
 Sundarbans is a UNESCO World Heritage Site, and a part of the forest within Indian territory is called Sundarbans National Park.
 This forest is not just a mangrove swamp. It is part of the last remnants of the great jungle that once covered the Ganges Plain.
 The Sundarbans cover an area of 3,850 km² and about one-third of it is covered by water and marshes.
 Since 1966, Sundarbans has been a wildlife sanctuary, and it is estimated that there are now 400 Bengal tigers and 30,000 deer in the area.
 Buses run all day from the interurban bus station (across the river), but buses to the east and to Jakarta/Bogor only leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 The buses are often full, so it is advisable to buy a ticket in advance a few days before.
 In most areas, comfortable and sturdy minibus taxis are available.
 Shared taxis are a fast and comfortable way to travel to nearby areas, such as Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200).
 The bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that connects the Oyapock River with the city of Oiapoque in Brazil and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock in French Guiana.
 The two towers are 83 m high, the length of the bridge is 378 m, and there are two lanes 3.50 m wide.
 The vertical distance under the bridge is 15 meters, and construction was completed in August 2011, and the prohibition of passage of the bridge was until March 2017.
 The bridge is scheduled to be fully operational in September 2017, when the construction of the Brazilian customs inspection station will be completed.
 The Guaraní are the most important indigenous group, living in eastern Paraguay, and are a semi-sedentary agricultural people who also practiced hunting.
 The Chaco region was home to other indigenous groups such as the Guaykurú and the Payaguá, who survived by hunting, gathering, and fishing.
 Paraguay, known as the "Land of the Guaranis," was born in the 16th century when Spanish conquerors and indigenous peoples met.
 The Spanish people began a three-century long period of colonialism.
 Since Asunción was founded in 1537, Paraguay has retained much of its indigenous character and identity.
 Argentina is famous for having the best polo teams and players in the world.
 The largest tournament of the year is held in December at the Polo Fields in Las Canitas.
 It is also possible to watch smaller tournaments and matches here at other times of the year.
 For tournament news and ticket information for polo matches, check out the Asociacion Argentina de Polo.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland pound (FKP), which is equivalent to 1 British pound (GBP).
 You can exchange money at the only bank on the island, which is located right across from the FIC West store in Stanley.
 The British pound is generally accepted everywhere on the islands, and so are the Stanley credit cards and the U.S. dollar.
 Credit cards are not accepted in the area of the booked accommodation, but you can use cash and debit cards. Please check with the owner in advance to determine what payment methods are accepted.
 It is almost impossible to exchange the Falkland Islands pound outside the islands, so exchange before leaving the islands.
 Montevideo is located on the southern edge of the equator, so when it is winter in the northern hemisphere, it is summer there, and vice versa.
 Montevideo is a subtropical city, with temperatures usually above 30°C in summer.
 Winters can be unbelievably cold. Temperatures below freezing are rare, but wind and humidity combine to make it feel colder than it actually is.
 ""Wet season"" and ""dry season"" do not exist in the strict sense. The rainfall is almost the same throughout the year."
 Many of the park's animals are used to seeing humans, but they are still wild and should not be fed or disturbed.
 According to park authorities, you must be at least 100 yards/meters away from bears and wolves, and at least 25 yards/meters away from all other wildlife.
 No matter how docile they may appear, elephants, elk, moose, bears, and almost all large animals can attack.
 Dozens of visitors are injured each year for not keeping a proper distance. These animals are big, wild and dangerous, so keep your distance.
 Additionally, the smell can attract bears or other wildlife, so you should carry smelly food in a sealed container or not cook with it and keep your camp clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The town is on the island of Upolu and has a population of just over 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the official capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The port was the site of a famous naval standoff in 1889 when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and the United Kingdom refused to leave the port.
 All but one of the British ships sank, and about 200 Americans and Germans lost their lives.
 During the period of the Mau movement, which was organised to fight for independence, a peaceful gathering in the village resulted in the death of the paramount chief, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Because Auckland is split by two harbours, there are many beaches, the most popular of which are in three areas.
 North Shore Beach (North Harbour District) is on the Pacific Ocean, stretching from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 It is a safe swimming beach, and most of the beaches are shaded by pohutukawa trees.
 Tamaki Drive Beach is on the Waitemata Harbour, in the suburb of St Heliers, between Mission Bay and central Auckland.
 These beaches are usually family beaches, and there are many shops along the coast, so it is safe to swim.
 The main local beer is Number One, which is not complex but a refreshing, pleasant beer. Another local beer is Manta.
 There are many French wines to try, but New Zealand and Australian wines are also easy to find.
 Local tap water is safe to drink, but bottled water is readily available if you are concerned.
 The concept of coffee for Australians is unfamiliar. Short black is espresso, cappuccino is creamy (no foam) and tea is served without milk.
 Hot chocolate is Belgian standard. Fruit juice is expensive but very tasty.
 I make many trips to this reef area throughout the year, but I rarely see injuries from these causes on the reef.
 Still, you should listen to the advice of officials and pay close attention to all the signs and safety warnings.
 Box jellyfish occur from October to April, and occasionally outside of this period.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack people. Most sharks are afraid of people and swim away.
 The sea crocodile does not live in the sea, but in the northern tributaries of the Rockhampton River.
 By booking in advance, travelers have the peace of mind that there will be a place to stay when they arrive at their destination.
 Travel agents often have deals on specific hotels, but you can also book other types of accommodation, such as camping sites, through them.
 Travel agents usually offer packages that include breakfast, airport pickup/transportation, and a simjeonghee airline ticket and hotel.
 We also reserve the right to hold a reservation for a customer if it is necessary to take time to make a decision or to obtain other documentation (e.g. visa) for the destination.
 However, if there are any changes or requests, please contact the hotel directly, not the travel agency.
 At some festivals, many people who attend the music festival decide to camp on the spot, and most of the attendees think that it is a must-experience.
 To get close to the action and excitement, get there early and camp near the music.
 Although the main stage may be over, don't forget that there are still plenty of places to dance and listen to music until late into the night.
 Some festivals have special camping areas for families with young children.
 When crossing the North Sea in winter, the ship will pass through the ice and make a lot of noise, so it is better to check the location of the room.
 The St. Petersburg cruise includes time in the city. Cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements (check the terms and conditions).
 Casinos usually go to great lengths to maximize the time and money spent by their patrons, and may have no windows or clocks, or may offer confusing and deceptive features to prevent gamblers from realizing how much time they have spent in the casino.
 They keep the visitors coming and the good vibes flowing by always having special food, drinks, and entertainment on hand.
 Some places offer free drinks, but alcohol dulls your judgment, so good gamblers know the importance of not getting drunk.
 If you are driving in high altitudes or on mountain roads, you should consider the possibility of snow, ice, or freezing temperatures.
 On icy or snow-covered roads, the friction is reduced, so you can't drive properly as if you were on a freshly paved road.
 If it snows, a lot of snow can fall in a short time, and you can get stuck.
 In addition, falling or flying snow, rain, or debris on the windshield can also limit visibility.
 In contrast, many countries have daily life on ice or snow-covered roads, and the roads are not blocked most of the year.
 Safari is perhaps the most spectacular tourist attraction in Africa and will be a highlight for many visitors.
 The term safari is commonly used to refer to overland travel in Africa, especially in the savannahs of East Africa, to see the wildlife in their natural habitat.
 Some animals, such as elephants and giraffes, tend to approach vehicles, and can be well observed with standard equipment.
 Lions, cheetahs, and leopards blush from time to time, so binoculars can help you see them better.
 "Hiking safari ("bushwalk", "hiking safari" or "safari walk") is a hike that can be done in a few hours or a few days."
 The Paralympic Games will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021, with some events taking place in multiple locations across Japan.
 Tokyo, which hosted the 1964 Summer Olympics, will be the only city in Asia to have hosted the Summer Olympics twice.
 If you booked flights and accommodation for 2020 before the announcement, you may be in for a bit of a headache.
 Refund policies vary, but as of the end of March, most refund policies for the Olympics have not been extended beyond July 2020.
 Most event tickets are priced between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, while general admission tickets are priced at around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes can help them dry faster. Many hotels have ironing boards and ironing boards available for rent, even if they are not in the room.
 You may not have an iron or like to wear ironed socks, in which case you can use a hair dryer.
 Be careful not to overheat the fabric (it may shrink or stain).
 There are other ways to purify water, some of which are more effective at removing certain contaminants.
 In some areas, one minute of boiling is sufficient, while in others, it may take several minutes.
 Water filters vary in effectiveness, and in cases where water quality is a concern, it is recommended to drink bottled water from a reputable brand.
 Travellers may encounter animal pests that are not common in their own area.
 Pests can spoil food, cause inflammation or, worse, trigger allergic reactions, spread toxins or even cause epidemics.
 The disease itself, or dangerous animals that can injure or kill humans by force, are not usually considered pests.
 Duty-free shopping is an opportunity to buy goods that are exempt from taxes and consumption taxes in certain areas.
 Travelers from countries with high taxes can sometimes save a significant amount of money, especially when buying alcohol or cigarettes.
 The road between Point Marion and Fairmont, located in a remote mountainous area, is known as one of the most difficult roads to drive on the entire Buffalo-Pittsburgh Expressway.
 If you are not used to driving in the countryside, beware of steep slopes, narrow lanes and sharp bends.
 The posted speed limit is noticeably lower than on the previous and subsequent sections - usually 35-40 mph (56-64 km / h) - and in this section compliance with the speed limit is much more important than in other sections.
 Interestingly, cell phone service is much stronger here than at many other points along this route, such as Pennsylvania's Wissahickon.
 German pastries are quite good, and in Bavaria, they are similar to Austria in that they are rich and varied, with lots of butter.
 Fruit pies are common, with apples going into pies year-round, and cherries or plums are common in the summer.
 Many of Germany's baked goods also contain almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts. Popular cakes are especially good with strong coffee and especially with milk.
 If you want a small, flavorful loaf, try this bread, which is called Berliner, Pfannkuchen, or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 Curry is a dish that is based on medicinal herbs and spices, and is accompanied by meat or vegetables.
 "Curry can be ""thick"" or ""thin"" depending on the amount of water used."
 In the interior of northern India and Pakistan, yogurt is commonly used in curries, while in southern India and other coastal regions of the subcontinent, coconut milk is commonly used.
 Indonesian food is a generic term for the vast array of regional cuisines found in the 17,000 islands that make up the country.
 However, when used without qualification, the term tends to refer to the food of central and eastern Java.
 Now, a wide range of Java-style recipes are available throughout the archipelago, and the signature flavors of the Javanese are peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut sugar), and a variety of spices.
 The backrest is a support for the rider's feet on both sides of the saddle.
 This device gives the rider much more stability, but it can also cause a foot to get caught, which could be a safety issue.
 If a person riding a horse falls off the horse and gets his foot caught in the stirrups, he can be dragged along by the horse. To minimize this danger, several safety precautions can be taken.
 First, most riders have a heel and wear a narrow, smooth riding boot.
 Next, some saddles, particularly those in the UK, have a safety strap which can be used to keep the girth from falling off the saddle if the rider falls backwards.
 Cochamó Valley - The best climbing area in Chile, known as the Yosemite Valley of South America, with large granite walls and rocky peaks.
 The summit of the mountain has a breathtaking view from the peak. Climbers from all over the world are constantly seeking new paths in the infinite potential of nature.
 Ski and snowboarding are popular sports that involve sliding down snow-covered terrain with skis or a snowboard attached to your feet.
 "Ski trips are a way of traveling that is enjoyed by ski enthusiasts, called ski bums, who plan their vacation around skiing at one particular location."
 The idea of skiing is very old. Cave paintings depicting people skiing date back to 5,000 B.C.
 As a sport, downhill skiing dates at least to the 17th century, and the first recreational ski club was founded in 1861 by Norwegians in Australia.
 Skiing Backpacking: This activity is also called backcountry skiing, ski touring, or ski hiking.
 This activity is related to Alpine ski touring and mountaineering, but usually does not include them, and in the latter case is done in steep terrain and requires much more advanced skiing and boots.
 Think of a ski course as a hiking course.
 In good conditions, you can cover a little more distance than walking, but you will not be able to go as fast as cross-country skiing without a well-maintained track and a heavy backpack.
 Europe is a continent with relatively few independent countries, but traveling between them usually means applying for visas and going through passport control several times.
 However, the Schengen zone acts somewhat like a country in this respect.
 As long as you stay in this zone, you can usually cross the border without having to go through passport control again.
 Similarly, holding a Schengen visa means that you do not need to apply for a visa individually in each Schengen country, which saves time, money and paperwork.
 There is no universal definition of antiques. In some countries, anything over 100 years old is considered an antique.
 Compared to Europe, North America has a shorter geographic history of defining antiques.
 Handicrafts are not as durable as mass produced goods, but they can be defined as antiques.
 Reindeer herding is one of the Sami people's main livelihoods, and in trade, such a culture also has important meaning for other people.
 Traditionally, not all Sámi have been involved in large-scale reindeer husbandry, but most have kept reindeer as pack animals and supplemented their income with fishing and hunting.
 Today, many Sami work in modern trade. Tourism is an important source of income in the Sami area of Sápmi.
 Especially non-Romani, it is widely used among the Romani, but because of the negative stereotypes and inaccurate perceptions about Romani people, the word "gypsy" is often considered offensive.
 If the country you are visiting becomes a travel alert area, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You may want to hear the government's opinion rather than your own, but the advice of each country's government is tailored to its own citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may find themselves in a different situation than Europeans or Arabs.
 The alert is merely a brief summary of the political situation in a country.
 The views presented are primarily superficial, general, and overly simplistic in comparison to more detailed information available elsewhere.
 Adverse weather is a general term for dangerous weather phenomena that can cause damage, severe social disruption, or loss of life.
 Adverse weather can occur anywhere in the world and there are different types depending on the local, topographical and atmospheric conditions.
 Wind, hail, excessive rainfall, and forest fires are forms and effects of adverse weather.
 Localized and seasonal severe weather events include blizzards, snowstorms, dust storms, and sandstorms.
 Travelers should look up the local weather beforehand to avoid any hiccups in their travel plans.
 Anyone planning to visit a country considered a combat zone should definitely get professional training.
 An Internet search for 'hostile environment course' will probably give you the local company's address.
 The lectures generally cover much more detail on all the topics discussed here, and are usually accompanied by practical experience.
 The course is usually two to five days long and involves role-playing, various first aid techniques, and occasionally weapons training.
 Books and magazines dealing with wild survival are common, but those dealing with war zones are rare.
 Travelers planning to have gender reassignment surgery abroad should make sure they have valid documentation when they return.
 Some countries will issue passports with an X for gender, or allow you to change your name and gender on your passport.
 The willingness of foreign governments to accept these documents is also very diverse.
 In the post-9/11 era, airport security screening has become even more of a hassle.
 Transgender people before surgery should not expect to pass the scanner because of their privacy and dignity.
 Rip currents are often formed by waves breaking on reefs or other similar structures.
 Due to the systematic classification of the underwater environment, the return water is concentrated in some deep places, and this can form from rapid current to deep water.
 Most of them try to swim against the current, which is mostly impossible, and they die of exhaustion.
 Once you get out of the current, it's not that hard to swim back to shore.
 You can either try to find a place where you won't get swept away again, or wait for rescue, depending on your swimming ability or whether you were spotted by someone else.
 Culture shock happens more quickly, lasts longer, and is more intense than culture shock because the re-entry shock is not mitigated by the honeymoon phase.
 Travelers who have not had difficulty adjusting to a new culture often have a particularly difficult time adjusting to their native culture again.
 When returning home after living abroad, they may lose some of the habits of their own culture while adapting to the culture of the country they are returning to.
 When you first go abroad, most people will be understanding and tolerant because they know that you are adjusting to a new country.
 People may not think that patience and understanding are necessary for travelers returning home.
 The pyramid sound and light show is one of the most popular attractions for children in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark and you can see the pyramids in silence before the show starts.
 You will always hear the sounds of tourists and vendors, and the story of light and sound is like a storybook.
 SpongeBob is set as the narrator of the background and long story.
 Scenes were projected onto the pyramids, and other pyramids were illuminated by fire.
 The South Shetland Islands, discovered in 1819, are claimed by several countries and, in 2020, had the most bases of any archipelago, with 16.
 The islands are located about 120 km north of the Antarctic Peninsula, the largest of which is King George Island, where the Villa Las Estrellas research station is located.
 Other islands include Livingston Island and Deception Island, which are still active volcanoes and provide natural harbors filled with water.
 Eelsworthland is located on the southern tip of the peninsula, and is bordered by the Belingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of the peninsula here rise into a plateau, then re-emerge to form a 220-mile-long (360 km) belt of the Elsworth Mountains, which are bisected by the Minnesota glacier.
 The northern regions or the Centennial Mountains are home to the highest peak in Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, which is 4,892 m high.
 If you are in a remote area where your cell phone does not have coverage, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 Satellite phones are not usually a replacement for a cell phone, as they require a direct line of sight to a satellite and a clear line of sight to a ground station.
 The service is used for maritime transportation, including pleasure craft, and for places where voice and data services are required.
 For this service connection, you will receive more information from your local telecommunications provider.
 The gap year is becoming more and more popular among people who travel and study.
 This is particularly popular with graduates, as it allows them to take a year out of their studies without it being a huge burden on their academic career.
 In most cases, enrolling on a gap year course abroad will actually increase your chances of going on to higher education back home.
 Generally, there is a fee to enroll in these educational programs.
 "Finland is a good place to enjoy boating. "The Land of a thousand lakes" has thousands of lakes and thousands of islands on the coastal archipelago."
 Islands and lakes do not require a yacht.
 Although the coastal islands and large lakes are large enough for any yacht, it is also a different experience to take a smaller boat or even a kayak.
 In Finland, boating is a national pastime, with one boat per seven to eight people.
 This is similar to cases in Norway, Sweden and New Zealand, but is quite unusual outside of these countries (New Zealand has one case per 40,000 people).
 Certainly, most of the Baltic Sea cruises offer a long stay in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 That means you can spend a day or two exploring the historic city and then return to your cruise ship for the night.
 If you are going to the coast on a cruise, you do not need a separate visa (since 2009).
 Some cruise ships have a guidebook that includes Berlin, Germany, but Berlin is not near the sea, as you can see on the map, and visiting the city is not included in the cruise ship price.
 Flying can be a scary experience for anyone, but especially for those who have never flown before or are afraid of flying.
 This is not something to be ashamed of, and is no different from the personal fears, disgusts and aversions that most people have for other things.
 For some people, understanding how an airplane works, and what happens during a flight, can help them overcome their fears, based on not knowing or not being in control.
 The courier company receives a lot of money for delivering the goods quickly. Often, the time is very important for business documents, for urgent repairs or spare parts.
 Major airlines use their own aircraft on some routes, but for other routes or for small airlines, there is a problem.
 If you are shipping by air freight, some routes may take several days to clear customs and retrieve your baggage.
 The only way to get it processed faster was to send it as checked baggage, which airline regulations do not allow without a passenger on board.
 The only sure way to fly first class or business class is to pay a lot of money (or have your company pay for you).
 So it's not cheap, but it's not as expensive as you might think: it could cost you around four times the price of a business class ticket, or up to 11 times the price of a first class ticket!
 In general, a direct flight from Area A to Area B is not worth the trouble of trying to get a seat discount, whether it is a business class or a first class.
 Airlines know that there is a certain core group of passengers who are willing to pay a premium for the privilege of getting somewhere fast and comfortably.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau, and the language is Romanian, but Russian is widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic that has suffered from ethnic strife.
 The conflict of 1994 created the Transnistria Republic in eastern Moldova, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any UN member state.
 Although political negotiations between the two Moldovas broke down, economic relations were restored.
 The main religion in Moldova is Eastern Orthodoxy.
 Izmir is the third largest city in Turkey with a population of about 3.7 million and is the second largest port after Istanbul and a very good transportation hub.
 Once an ancient city, Smyrna is now a modern, developed, commercial hub surrounded by a vast bay and mountains.
 The city has more of a Mediterranean European feel than traditional Turkey, but among the wide boulevards, glass-fronted buildings, and modern shopping centers are traditional red-tiled roofs, 18th-century markets, and old mosques and churches.
 From the village of Haldarsvik, you can see the nearby island of Eysturoy, and there is an unusual octagonal church.
 In the churchyard are some interesting marble carvings of pigeons on some of the tombs.
 It's worth spending 30 minutes to walk around this interesting town.
 To the north is the easily accessible romantic and enchanting town of Sintra, and the city is famous with foreigners for its beauty, which was praised by Byron.
 Scotturb bus 403 runs regularly to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also, to the north is the world-famous Shrine of Our Lady of Fatima, a place of pilgrimage.
 Remember that this is basically a huge cemetery and a place of great significance to the world's population, which is almost impossible to calculate.
 There are still many people living here. Many more precious people who were killed here or who died from hard labor. Jews or not.
 Please show respect, dignity and courtesy to the place. Please do not make jokes about the Holocaust or Nazis.
 Do not scratch or graffiti the site.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. Half of the population prefers to use Catalan, while the majority understands it and almost everyone speaks Spanish.
 However, most of the signs are written in Catalan, which is the official language established by law.
 However, Spanish is widely used in public transport and other facilities.
 The regular announcements on the metro are only in Catalan, but in the event of an unplanned disruption, the automatic system broadcasts in a variety of languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians have a reputation for being self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 "This is usually a misconception, but the best way to live in Paris is still to behave like a ""bien élevé"" person, and it will make life easier."
 The Parisians' surly exterior will melt away quickly if you show them basic courtesy.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is covered with dense forests of beech, fir, spruce, and alpine and Mediterranean plants.
 The wide range of microclimates, different soils and elevations allow for a wide range of plant species.
 The area is also home to a wide variety of animals and birds.
 There, the European brown bear, wolf, eagle, owl, snake, cat, and many other more common species are found together with a few rare ones.
 During a visit to the monastery, women must wear a skirt that covers their knees and cover their shoulders.
 Most monasteries will provide a cover that can be draped over the shoulders for visiting women who have not brought their own, but if you bring a cover in a bright color, you will be greeted with a smile at the entrance by the monk or nun.
 Along the same lines, men are required to wear pants that cover their knees.
 You can rent them at the entrance, but since they are not washed every time they are used by everyone, it may be uncomfortable to wear such a kimono. You can wear it for all men in one size!
 Like the food of the Mediterranean, the food of Mallorca is based on bread, vegetables, meat (especially pork), and olive oil.
 A simple, and particularly popular in the summer, evening meal is the pâté mbembé, a bread with a simple dressing of easily available condiments such as cheese, tuna, tomato and olive oil.
 All nouns that are used with the word Sie, which means you, always begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish between some verbs and nouns.
 Whether the verb or adjective is used in the form of a noun depends on the writing, and this makes it somewhat complicated, but it is certainly easier to read.
 Italian is relatively easy to pronounce because most words are pronounced exactly as they are spelled.
 The main letters to be aware of are c and g, as they vary depending on the vowel that follows them.
 Also, r and rr are pronounced differently. Caro means precious, but carro means chariot.
 Persian is relatively easy and has mostly regular grammar.
 Therefore, reading this grammar primer will help you learn a lot about Persian grammar and better understand the phrases.
 It goes without saying that if you know Romance languages, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, those who know a little Spanish may be tempted to conclude that Portuguese is so similar to Spanish that it is not necessary to study it separately.
 Observatories built before the modern era are mostly obsolete and are now used as museums or educational facilities.
 In their day, light pollution was not at the same level as it is today, so they were located in places that were easier to access than today's observatories and campuses.
 Most modern research telescopes are large facilities located in remote areas with favorable atmospheric conditions.
 The cherry blossom viewing festival, known as Hanami, has been a part of Japanese culture since the 8th century.
 This concept was taken from China, where the plum blossom is chosen as a part of culture.
 The first cherry blossom party in Japan was held in the Imperial Palace grounds by the Emperor. Only the Emperor and members of the nobility were invited to the party.
 "Plants look their best in their natural environment, so the temptation to take just one specimen is one that should be resisted."
 "Visiting a formally arranged garden to collect 'specimens' is a sure way to get thrown out."
 Singapore is generally a very safe place, with very convenient transportation and almost everything you could want to buy once you arrive.
 "But if you are in the ""equatorial"" zone, a few degrees north or south of the equator, you will have to contend with high temperatures (always high) and strong sunlight (rarely clear)."
 There are also buses to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, and their wives.
 Make sure the bus you are about to get on is not going to Kiryat Arba, the Jewish settlement near Hebron, but to Hebron.
 Inland waterways can be a good subject for a holiday.
 For example, visit the castles of the Rhine and Loire valleys, take a cruise on the Danube to interesting places, or take a boat ride along the Seine.
 They also have popular hiking and cycling routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in Christianity, celebrating the birth of Jesus.
 Many of the traditions surrounding the holiday have become universalized among non-Christians and non-Christian religions worldwide.
 There is a tradition of staying awake on Easter night to see the sunrise.
 Of course there is a Christian theological explanation for this tradition, but it may be a pre-Christian spring and harvest ritual.
 The more traditional churches hold an Easter Vigil on Saturday night of Easter week, where the congregation often celebrates the Resurrection at midnight.
 All the animals that first arrived on the island either swam, flew, or arrived on the island as a floating log.
 Mammals were unable to travel like the giant tortoises of the Galapagos, because of the great distance from the mainland.
 Since humans arrived on the Galapagos, many mammals, including goats, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs, have been introduced to the islands.
 If you visit the polar regions in winter, you will experience polar night, when the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 The sky is dark all day long, which gives you a good chance to see the Aurora.
 The area is sparsely populated, so light pollution is not a problem, and it is possible to enjoy the stars in the night sky.
 Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and formal than Westerners.
 A suit is the standard of business attire, and colleagues refer to each other by first name or title.
 In the workplace, teamwork is very important, so it emphasizes the collective effort over the individual achievement.
 The worker must always get the boss's approval for any decision he makes and must follow the boss's orders without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.29354209379251034, 'precisions': [0.6253101736972705, 0.35954765193370164, 0.23203646867665645, 0.15564699205448354], 'brevity_penalty': 0.977874575876586, 'length_ratio': 0.9781157720156951, 'translation_length': 24180, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 57.07204861783374, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}